Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.45.030

Washington State University—Tri-Cities area.

(1) Washington State University is responsible for providing baccalaureate and graduate level higher education programs to the citizens of the Tri-Cities area, under rules or guidelines adopted by the student achievement council and in accordance with proportionality agreements emphasizing access for transfer students developed with the state board for community and technical colleges. Washington State University shall meet that responsibility through the operation of a campus in the Tri-Cities area. The Tri-Cities campus shall replace and supersede the Tri-Cities university center. All land, facilities, equipment, and personnel of the Tri-Cities university center shall be transferred from the University of Washington to Washington State University.

(2) Beginning in the fall of 2007, the Washington State University Tri-Cities campus may directly admit first-year students and sophomore students.

[ 2017 c 52 s 8; 2013 c 23 s 55; 2012 c 229 s 533; 2006 c 166 s 1; 2005 c 258 s 4; 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Findings—Intent—2005 c 258: See note following RCW 28B.45.014.